Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5909.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Low-enrollment program" means an undergraduate degree program at a public baccalaureate institution that produces fewer than 10 graduates per academic year, averaged over the most recent five-year period.(2) "Public baccalaureate institution" has the same meaning as the state universities and regional universities defined under RCW 28B.10.016.(3) "Teach-out plan" means a plan developed by a public baccalaureate institution to ensure that students currently enrolled in a discontinued program have a reasonable opportunity to complete their degree.(4) "Undergraduate degree program" means a program at a public baccalaureate institution where a student receives a baccalaureate degree at completion of the program.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) Each governing board of a public baccalaureate institution shall annually identify and compile a list of low-enrollment programs.(2) A program that appears on the low-enrollment list for three consecutive years is subject to a discontinuance review by the governing board.(3) In conducting the discontinuance review, the governing board must consider extenuating circumstances including, but not limited to:(a) The program is new and has been offered for fewer than five years;(b) Equity and access considerations;(c) Workforce demand or specialized regional need; and(d) Accreditation or licensure requirements.(4) Should the governing board find no extenuating circumstances in its review under subsection (3) of this section, the board shall recommend discontinuing the program.(5) Any recommendation for discontinuance must include a teach-out plan for enrolled students. All recommendations and plans for the program must be included in the annual report required by section 3 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) Where an undergraduate degree program has appeared on a public baccalaureate institution's low-enrollment list for three consecutive years, the public baccalaureate institution shall include it in a report on low-enrollment programs to the legislature. The report must include:(a) All low-enrollment programs identified under section 2 of this act;(b) Actions taken by the governing board regarding low-enrollment programs;(c) Data used in the review demonstrating that the program or programs identified meet the threshold requirements in section 2 of this act;(d) Analysis of the program's financial and student-outcome performance;(e) Extenuating circumstances regarding the program, as outlined in section 2(3) of this act; and(f) The strategy for either the:(i) Closure of the program by the institution, if the governing board recommends discontinuance, including any teach-out plan, consolidation, or other arrangement; or(ii) Continuance of the program, if the governing board recommends continuing the program, and the reason for that decision.(2) The report must be submitted annually in compliance with RCW 43.01.036 to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature by the end of the proceeding calendar year.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Sections 1 through 3 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2026.--- END ---